Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 45.2-2000.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Board”
means the State Water Control Board.

“Correlative right”
means the right of each geothermal owner in a geothermal system to produce without waste his just and equitable share of the geothermal resources in the geothermal system.

“Geothermal energy”
means the usable energy that is produced or that can be produced from a geothermal resource.

“Geothermal resource”
means the natural heat of the earth and the energy, in whatever form, that is present in, associated with, or created by, or that may be extracted from, such natural heat, as determined by the regulations of the Department.

“Geothermal system”
means any aquifer, pool, reservoir, or other geologic formation containing geothermal resources.

History.

1981, c. 506, § 45.1-179.2; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Rights to geothermal resources. —

Rights to geothermal resources belong to the owner of the surface property unless specifically conveyed. They are not encompassed within mineral or water rights. Thus, a mineral or a water reservation does not reserve a geothermal resource, and a lease of oil, gas or some other mineral is not a lease of geothermal resources. The rights of the owner of a geothermal resource as related to the rights of owners of other property interests depend on the particular language of the instruments and all other relevant circumstances, as is the case generally in property law. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Terry G. Kilgore, Member, House of Delegates, No. 14-012,
(12/19/14).

Applicable statutory or regulatory standards for geothermal resources refer only to temperature and volume but not to depth of the resource below the surface or type of use, whether residential or commercial. Heat pumps are not regulated by Virginia laws on geothermal resources, so long as they do not exceed threshold standards for temperature and volume. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Terry G. Kilgore, Member, House of Delegates, No. 14-012,
(12/19/14).

§ 45.2-2001.
Application.

The provisions of this chapter regarding (i) permitting, well regulations, reservoir management, and allocation apply to geothermal resources at temperatures above the minimum temperature set forth by the Department pursuant to §

45.2-2004

and (ii) leasing requirements, royalties, or severance taxes apply to geothermal resource applications producing more than the volumetric rate set forth by the Department pursuant to §

45.2-2004

.

History.

1981, c. 506, § 45.1-179.3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Taxation of geothermal resources. —

In the absence of any legislation by the General Assembly establishing how geothermal resources are to be taxed, they are to be assessed either as leaseholds taxable as real estate to the lessees if leased or, if not leased, to be included as a factor affecting the assessed fair market value of the real estate they occupy, regardless of whether or not energy is being extracted from them. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Terry G. Kilgore, Member, House of Delegates, No. 14-012,
(12/19/14).

§ 45.2-2002.
Ownership.

Ownership rights to a geothermal resource are in the owner of the surface property underlain by the geothermal resource unless such rights have been otherwise explicitly reserved or conveyed. Nothing in this section shall divest the people or the Commonwealth of any rights, title, or interest they might have in any geothermal resource.

History.

1981, c. 506, § 45.1-179.4; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Rights to geothermal resources. —

Rights to geothermal resources belong to the owner of the surface property unless specifically conveyed. They are not encompassed within mineral or water rights. Thus, a mineral or a water reservation does not reserve a geothermal resource, and a lease of oil, gas or some other mineral is not a lease of geothermal resources. The rights of the owner of a geothermal resource as related to the rights of owners of other property interests depend on the particular language of the instruments and all other relevant circumstances, as is the case generally in property law. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Terry G. Kilgore, Member, House of Delegates, No. 14-012,
(12/19/14).

§ 45.2-2003.
Findings; clarification of nature of the resource.

Geothermal resources are found and hereby declared to be sui generis, being neither mineral resources nor water resources. No mineral estate shall be construed to include geothermal resources unless such inclusion is explicit in the terms of the deed or other instrument of conveyance.

History.

1981, c. 506, § 45.1-179.5; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Rights to geothermal resources. —

Rights to geothermal resources belong to the owner of the surface property unless specifically conveyed. They are not encompassed within mineral or water rights. Thus, a mineral or a water reservation does not reserve a geothermal resource, and a lease of oil, gas or some other mineral is not a lease of geothermal resources. The rights of the owner of a geothermal resource as related to the rights of owners of other property interests depend on the particular language of the instruments and all other relevant circumstances, as is the case generally in property law. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Terry G. Kilgore, Member, House of Delegates, No. 14-012,
(12/19/14).

Taxation of geothermal resources. —

In the absence of any legislation by the General Assembly establishing how geothermal resources are to be taxed, they are to be assessed either as leaseholds taxable as real estate to the lessees if leased or, if not leased, to be included as a factor affecting the assessed fair market value of the real estate they occupy, regardless of whether or not energy is being extracted from them. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Terry G. Kilgore, Member, House of Delegates, No. 14-012,
(12/19/14).